Hawaii, session 2026, HB2548.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  Chapter 141, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended by adding a new section to part I to be appropriately designated and to read as follows: "§141-    Climate-resilient food systems grant program; established; requirements; rules. (a)  There is established a climate-resilient food systems grant program to be administered by the department to support climate adaptation, resiliency, and food system infrastructure in the State. (b)  The department shall award grants to agricultural producers, including farmers and ranchers, and food and resilience hubs in the State.  The grant program shall provide assistance for applicants to cover the costs of: (1)  The acquisition of special-purpose equipment or technology; (2)  Personnel expenses and wages; and (3)  Training expenses. (c)  Grants shall be awarded on a competitive basis through a request for applications. (d)  An applicant may apply for grants in a form pursuant to rules adopted by the department; provided that an application shall include: (1)  A description of the purpose for which grant moneys will be expended; (2)  A plan for implementing specific strategies to expand the production, processing, storage, and distribution of agricultural products; (3)  A description of how the applicant intends to use the grant for projects that support climate adaptation, resiliency, food system infrastructure, and the expansion of local agricultural production; and (4)  Any other information that the department may require. (e)  The department shall adopt rules pursuant to chapter 91 for the purposes of this section. (f)  As used in this section: "Department" means the department of agriculture and biosecurity. "Grant program" means the climate-resilient food systems grant program." SECTION 2.  There is appropriated out of the general revenues of the State of Hawaii the sum of $ or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2026-2027 for the establishment of the climate-resilient food systems grant program. The sum appropriated shall be expended by the department of agriculture and biosecurity for the purposes of this Act. SECTION 3.  New statutory material is underscored. SECTION 4.  This Act shall take effect on July 1, 2026. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________